Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-836
Boundary bridge; bonds; election; limitation on amount.

The question of issuing bonds shall first be submitted to the qualified electors of the county, township, precinct, city, or village either at a special election called for that purpose or at a general election as provided in sections 39-837 to 39-841. If a majority of the votes cast at such election are in favor of the proposition to issue bonds, then such county, township, precinct, city, or village, as the case may be, shall issue its bonds in such amounts as specified in the notices of election, not exceeding three and five-tenths percent of the taxable valuation of such county, township, precinct, city, or village as shown by the last assessment prior to the vote authorizing the issuance of such bonds.

Laws 1895, c. 45, § 2, p. 187;

R.S.1913, § 2997;

C.S.1922, § 2749;

C.S.1929, § 39-835;

R.S.1943, § 39-836;

Laws 1971, LB 534, § 27;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 155;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 137.

Power of county to issue bonds is purely statutory and must be exercised in manner prescribed. Ahern v. Richardson County, 127 Neb. 659, 256 N.W. 515 (1934).